Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-459
Shooting coyotes from aircraft; permitholder; report.

The holder of a permit issued under section 37-458 shall report to the commission, not later than fifteen days after the end of each calendar quarter, the number of coyotes taken during such quarter.

Laws 1972, LB 1204, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-234;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 169.